Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds, federal funds and funds described in section 2  of this 2021 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of State Lands, for the following purposes:
(1) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 40,779,060
(2) Submerged Lands
Enhancement Fund ................... $ 200,000
(3) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 2,642,051
(4) Capital improvements ............... $ 549,056
(5) Oregon Wetlands
Revolving Fund ......................... $ 2,048,739
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,249,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of State Lands from the Portland  Harbor Cleanup
Fund established by ORS 274.064.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Lands  for
the following purposes:
(1) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 2,738,001
(2) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 195,954
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures  by the Department
of State Lands for tenant-incurred utility charges, unclaimed property finders fees and State
Treasurer charges for investment-related transactions are not limited.
SECTION 5.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 2